Georgia, session 2025_26, SB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to distilled spirits,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"3-4-4.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'consumable hemp product' and 'retail
consumable hemp establishment license' shall have the same meanings as set forth in Code
Section 2-23-3.
(b) Nothing in this chapter nor any rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner
pursuant to this chapter shall prohibit a licensed retail dealer in distilled spirits from
obtaining a retail consumable hemp establishment license and, upon obtaining such license,
selling or offering for sale consumable hemp products to consumers in accordance with the
S. B. 294
- 1 -

LC 55 0547
provisions of Chapter 23 of Title 2, the 'Georgia Hemp Farming Act,' and the rules and
regulations promulgated by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to said chapter. The
sale or offering for sale of consumable hemp products to consumers by a licensed retail
dealer in distilled spirits shall be governed and regulated exclusively by the provisions of
said chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Agriculture
pursuant to said chapter."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 294
- 2 -